Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.901

Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter apply to any motor fuel franchise or contract entered into or renewed on or after June 30, 1986, between a motor fuel refiner-supplier and a motor fuel retailer.

[ 1986 c 320 s 15.]